Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3235 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education to be
designated the "Tinnitus Research Grant Program Revolving Fund".
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of monies appropriated by the
Legislature and private dollars given to the Oklahoma State Regents
Req. No. 10198 Page 1

for Higher Education for the purpose of supporting the tinnitus
research grant program. All monies accruing to the credit of the
fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for the purpose of
running and distributing the tinnitus research grant program
described in subsection B of this section. Expenditures from the
fund shall be made on warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
B. Contingent upon the amount of funds available in the
Tinnitus Research Grant Program Revolving Fund, the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education shall award one or more grants annually
to private and public universities in Oklahoma. The grants shall be
used to research and find a cure for tinnitus. The Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education shall determine the criteria for and
establish a process for the submission of grant applications. The
applications shall be considered on a statewide competitive basis.
The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall promulgate
rules for the implementation of the grants issued pursuant to this
section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10198 AQH 11/18/24
Req. No. 10198 Page 2